Illinois, session 104th, SB1920.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Sections 52-3.118a and 2-3.206 and by changing Sections 21B-30 and 627-13.3 as follows: 7    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.118a new)8    Sec. 2-3.118a. Artificial intelligence.9    (a) The State Board of Education, in consultation with 10stakeholders, shall develop statewide guidance for school 11districts and educators on the use of artificial intelligence 12in elementary and secondary education. This guidance shall 13include, but is not limited to:14        (1) explanations of basic artificial intelligence 15    concepts, including machine learning, natural language 16    processing, and computer vision;17        (2) specific ways artificial intelligence can be used 18    at the district, school, and classroom levels to inform 19    teaching and learning practices while preserving the human 20    relationships essential to effective teaching and 21    learning;22        (3) how districts and educators can evaluate and 23    address bias, privacy, transparency, and risk assessment   SB1920 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10324 LNS 20398 b1    and management in the usage of artificial intelligence 2    technologies and applications;3        (4) the impact of artificial intelligence on 4    student-data privacy, including federal and State statutes 5    associated with student-data privacy that are important to 6    be aware of when setting policy for the use of artificial 7    intelligence technologies in schools, such as the federal 8    Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, the 9    federal Children's Internet Protection Act, the federal 10    Children's Online Privacy Protection Act of 1998, the 11    Illinois School Student Records Act, and the Student 12    Online Personal Protection Act;13        (5) best practices for developing student literacy in 14    artificial intelligence and engaging students in 15    age-appropriate discussions on the responsible and ethical 16    use of artificial intelligence;17        (6) best practices for making age-appropriate and 18    developmentally appropriate artificial intelligence 19    applications available and accessible to all students;20        (7) best practices and effective strategies for 21    supporting special populations, such as English learners 22    and students with disabilities;23        (8) the impacts that the use of artificial 24    intelligence may have in an educational setting, such as 25    unintentional and disparate biases against special 26    populations inherent within artificial intelligence   SB1920 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 10324 LNS 20398 b1    products; and2        (9) resources and support available for districts, 3    including the State Board of Education's Learning 4    Technology Center, for the implementation of artificial 5    intelligence in educational settings.6    The State Board of Education shall develop and publish 7this guidance by July 1, 2026 and provide continuous updates 8as it deems necessary.9    (b) The State Superintendent of Education may convene 10stakeholders for a statewide council to consult on the further 11development of guidance, resources, and other support for 12school districts and educators on the use of artificial 13intelligence in schools. The council must include individuals 14with expertise in artificial intelligence and no fewer than 2 15currently practicing classroom teachers. The council shall 16represent the ethnic, racial, and geographic diversity of this 17State and include expertise across early childhood and 18elementary, middle, and high school settings. 19    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.206 new)20    Sec. 2-3.206. American Sign Language implementation. No 21later than July 1, 2026, the State Board of Education shall 22encourage school districts to collect teaching resources to 23support American Sign Language programs. The teaching 24resources may include, but need not be limited to: 25        (1) the importance and benefits of American Sign   SB1920 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 10324 LNS 20398 b1    Language instruction for early ages and the prevalence of 2    American Sign Language in the United States;3        (2) information on ways to implement American Sign 4    Language instruction into the kindergarten through grade 8 5    curriculum; and6        (3) information on how to properly administer American 7    Sign Language instruction for students in kindergarten 8    through grade 8. 9    (105 ILCS 5/21B-30)10    Sec. 21B-30. Educator testing.11    (a) (Blank).12    (b) The State Board of Education, in consultation with the 13State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, shall design 14and implement a system of examinations, which shall be 15required prior to the issuance of educator licenses. These 16examinations and indicators must be based on national and 17State professional teaching standards, as determined by the 18State Board of Education, in consultation with the State 19Educator Preparation and Licensure Board. 20    The State Board of Education may adopt such rules as may be 21necessary to implement and administer this Section.22    (c) (Blank).23    (c-5) The State Board must adopt rules to implement a 24paraprofessional competency test. This test would allow an 25applicant seeking an Educator License with Stipulations with a   SB1920 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 10324 LNS 20398 b1paraprofessional educator endorsement to obtain the 2endorsement if he or she passes the test and meets the other 3requirements of subparagraph (J) of paragraph (2) of Section 421B-20 other than the higher education requirements. 5    (d) All applicants seeking a State license shall be 6required to pass a test of content area knowledge for each area 7of endorsement for which there is an applicable test. There 8shall be no exception to this requirement.9    (d-5) The State Board shall consult with any applicable 10vendors within 90 days after July 28, 2023 (the effective date 11of Public Act 103-402) to develop a plan to transition the test 12of content area knowledge in the endorsement area of 13elementary education, grades one through 6, by July 1, 2026 to 14a content area test that contains testing elements that cover 15bilingualism, biliteracy, oral language development, 16foundational literacy skills, and developmentally appropriate 17higher-order comprehension and on which a valid and reliable 18language and literacy subscore can be determined. The State 19Board shall base its rules concerning the passing subscore on 20the language and literacy portion of the test on the 21recommended cut-score determined in the formal 22standard-setting process. Candidates need not achieve a 23particular subscore in the area of language and literacy. The 24State Board shall aggregate and publish the number of 25candidates in each preparation program who take the test and 26the number who pass the language and literacy portion.  SB1920 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 10324 LNS 20398 b1    (e) (Blank).2    (f) Beginning on August 4, 2023 (the effective date of 3Public Act 103-488) through August 31, 2025, no candidate 4completing a teacher preparation program in this State or 5candidate subject to Section 21B-35 of this Code is required 6to pass a teacher performance assessment. Except as otherwise 7provided in this Article, beginning on September 1, 2015 until 8August 4, 2023 (the effective date of Public Act 103-488) and 9beginning again on September 1, 2025, all candidates 10completing teacher preparation programs in this State and all 11candidates subject to Section 21B-35 of this Code are required 12to pass a teacher performance assessment approved by the State 13Board of Education, in consultation with the State Educator 14Preparation and Licensure Board. A candidate may not be 15required to submit test materials by video submission. Subject 16to appropriation, an individual who holds a Professional 17Educator License and is employed for a minimum of one school 18year by a school district designated as Tier 1 under Section 1918-8.15 may, after application to the State Board, receive 20from the State Board a refund for any costs associated with 21completing the teacher performance assessment under this 22subsection.23    (f-5) The Teacher Performance Assessment Task Force is 24created to evaluate potential performance-based and objective 25teacher performance assessment systems for implementation 26across all educator preparation programs in this State, with   SB1920 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 10324 LNS 20398 b1the intention of ensuring consistency across programs and 2supporting a thoughtful and well-rounded licensure system. 3Members appointed to the Task Force must reflect the racial, 4ethnic, and geographic diversity of this State. The Task Force 5shall consist of all of the following members:6        (1) One member of the Senate, appointed by the 7    President of the Senate.8        (2) One member of the Senate, appointed by the 9    Minority Leader of the Senate.10        (3) One member of the House of Representatives, 11    appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.12        (4) One member of the House of Representatives, 13    appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of 14    Representatives.15        (5) One member who represents a statewide professional 16    teachers' organization, appointed by the State 17    Superintendent of Education.18        (6) One member who represents a different statewide 19    professional teachers' organization, appointed by the 20    State Superintendent of Education.21        (7) One member from a statewide organization 22    representing school principals, appointed by the State 23    Superintendent of Education.24        (8) One member from a statewide organization 25    representing regional superintendents of schools, 26    appointed by the State Superintendent of Education.  SB1920 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 10324 LNS 20398 b1        (9) One member from a statewide organization 2    representing school administrators, appointed by the State 3    Superintendent of Education.4        (10) One member representing a school district 5    organized under Article 34 of this Code, appointed by the 6    State Superintendent of Education.7        (11) One member of an association representing rural 8    and small schools, appointed by the State Superintendent 9    of Education.10        (12) One member representing a suburban school 11    district, appointed by the State Superintendent of 12    Education.13        (13) One member from a statewide organization 14    representing school districts in the southern suburbs of 15    the City of Chicago, appointed by the State Superintendent 16    of Education.17        (14) One member from a statewide organization 18    representing large unit school districts, appointed by the 19    State Superintendent of Education.20        (15) One member from a statewide organization 21    representing school districts in the collar counties of 22    the City of Chicago, appointed by the State Superintendent 23    of Education.24        (16) Three members, each representing a different 25    public university in this State and each a current member 26    of the faculty of an approved educator preparation   SB1920 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 10324 LNS 20398 b1    program, appointed by the State Superintendent of 2    Education.3        (17) Three members, each representing a different 4    4-year nonpublic university or college in this State and 5    each a current member of the faculty of an approved 6    educator preparation program, appointed by the State 7    Superintendent of Education.8        (18) One member of the Board of Higher Education, 9    appointed by the State Superintendent of Education.10        (19) One member representing a statewide policy 11    organization advocating on behalf of multilingual students 12    and families, appointed by the State Superintendent of 13    Education.14        (20) One member representing a statewide organization 15    focused on research-based education policy to support a 16    school system that prepares all students for college, a 17    career, and democratic citizenship, appointed by the State 18    Superintendent of Education.19        (21) Two members representing an early childhood 20    advocacy organization, appointed by the State 21    Superintendent of Education.22        (22) One member representing a statewide organization 23    that partners with educator preparation programs and 24    school districts to support the growth and development of 25    preservice teachers, appointed by the State Superintendent 26    of Education.   SB1920 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 10324 LNS 20398 b1        (23) One member representing a statewide organization 2    that advocates for educational equity and racial justice 3    in schools, appointed by the State Superintendent of 4    Education.5        (24) One member representing a statewide organization 6    that represents school boards, appointed by the State 7    Superintendent of Education.8        (25) One member who has, within the last 5 years, 9    served as a cooperating teacher, appointed by the State 10    Superintendent of Education. 11    Members of the Task Force shall serve without 12compensation. The Task Force shall first meet at the call of 13the State Superintendent of Education, and each subsequent 14meeting shall be called by the chairperson of the Task Force, 15who shall be designated by the State Superintendent of 16Education. The State Board of Education shall provide 17administrative and other support to the Task Force.18    On or before October 31, 2024, the Task Force shall report 19on its work, including recommendations on a teacher 20performance assessment system in this State, to the State 21Board of Education and the General Assembly. The Task Force is 22dissolved upon submission of this report. 23    (g) The content area knowledge test and the teacher 24performance assessment shall be the tests that from time to 25time are designated by the State Board of Education, in 26consultation with the State Educator Preparation and Licensure   SB1920 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 10324 LNS 20398 b1Board, and may be tests prepared by an educational testing 2organization or tests designed by the State Board of 3Education, in consultation with the State Educator Preparation 4and Licensure Board. The test of content area knowledge shall 5assess content knowledge in a specific subject field. The 6tests must be designed to be racially neutral to ensure that no 7person taking the tests is discriminated against on the basis 8of race, color, national origin, or other factors unrelated to 9the person's ability to perform as a licensed employee. The 10score required to pass the tests shall be fixed by the State 11Board of Education, in consultation with the State Educator 12Preparation and Licensure Board. The State Board of 13Education's rules for scoring the content area knowledge test 14may include scoring and retaking of each test section 15separately and independently. The tests shall be administered 16not fewer than 3 times a year at such time and place as may be 17designated by the State Board of Education, in consultation 18with the State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board. 19    The State Board shall implement a test or tests to assess 20the speaking, reading, writing, and grammar skills of 21applicants for an endorsement or a license issued under 22subdivision (G) of paragraph (2) of Section 21B-20 of this 23Code in the English language and in the language of the 24transitional bilingual education program requested by the 25applicant. 26    (g-5) On or before July 1, 2026, the State Board of   SB1920 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 10324 LNS 20398 b1Education shall post publicly on its website the process by 2which the State Board or any entity designated by the State 3Board evaluates content area knowledge tests to determine 4content validity, an absence of bias, or the scores required 5to pass such tests. The State Board shall also make the 6following information publicly available on its website:7        (1) the process by which members are selected to form 8    a committee or group to make the determinations set forth 9    in this subsection (g-5); and10        (2) the agenda and summary of each meeting of any such 11    committee or group. 12    (h) Except as provided in Section 34-6 of this Code, the 13provisions of this Section shall apply equally in any school 14district subject to Article 34 of this Code.15    (i) The rules developed to implement and enforce the 16testing requirements under this Section shall include, without 17limitation, provisions governing test selection, test 18validation, and determination of a passing score, 19administration of the tests, frequency of administration, 20applicant fees, frequency of applicants taking the tests, the 21years for which a score is valid, and appropriate special 22accommodations. The State Board of Education shall develop 23such rules as may be needed to ensure uniformity from year to 24year in the level of difficulty for each form of an assessment.25(Source: P.A. 102-301, eff. 8-26-21; 103-402, eff. 7-28-23; 26103-488, eff. 8-4-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-780, eff.   SB1920 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 10324 LNS 20398 b18-2-24; 103-811, eff. 8-9-24; 103-846, eff. 8-9-24.) 2    (105 ILCS 5/27-13.3)3    Sec. 27-13.3. Internet safety education curriculum. 4    (a) The purpose of this Section is to inform and protect 5students from inappropriate or illegal communications and 6solicitation and to encourage school districts to provide 7education about Internet threats and risks, including without 8limitation child predators, fraud, and other dangers.9    (b) The General Assembly finds and declares the following:10        (1) it is the policy of this State to protect 11    consumers and Illinois residents from deceptive and unsafe 12    communications that result in harassment, exploitation, or 13    physical harm;14        (2) children have easy access to the Internet at home, 15    school, and public places;16        (3) the Internet is used by sexual predators and other 17    criminals to make initial contact with children and other 18    vulnerable residents in Illinois; and19        (4) education is an effective method for preventing 20    children from falling prey to online predators, identity 21    theft, and other dangers.22    (c) Each school may adopt an age-appropriate curriculum 23for Internet safety instruction of students in grades 24kindergarten through 12. However, beginning with the 2009-2010 25school year, a school district must incorporate into the   SB1920 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 10324 LNS 20398 b1school curriculum a component on Internet safety to be taught 2at least once each school year to students in grades 3 through 312. The school board shall determine the scope and duration of 4this unit of instruction. The age-appropriate unit of 5instruction may be incorporated into the current courses of 6study regularly taught in the district's schools, as 7determined by the school board, and it is recommended that the 8unit of instruction include the following topics:9        (1) Safe and responsible use of social networking 10    websites, chat rooms, electronic mail, bulletin boards, 11    instant messaging, and other means of communication on the 12    Internet.13        (2) Recognizing, avoiding, and reporting online 14    solicitations of students, their classmates, and their 15    friends by sexual predators.16        (3) Risks of transmitting personal information on the 17    Internet.18        (4) Recognizing and avoiding unsolicited or deceptive 19    communications received online.20        (5) Recognizing and reporting online harassment and 21    cyber-bullying, including the creation and distribution of 22    false representations of individuals created by artificial 23    intelligence, including, but not limited to, sexually 24    explicit images and videos.25        (6) Reporting illegal activities and communications on 26    the Internet.  SB1920 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 10324 LNS 20398 b1        (7) Copyright laws on written materials, photographs, 2    music, and video.3    (d) Curricula devised in accordance with subsection (c) of 4this Section may be submitted for review to the Office of the 5Illinois Attorney General.6    (e) The State Board of Education shall make available 7resource materials for educating children regarding child 8online safety and may take into consideration the curriculum 9on this subject developed by other states, as well as any other 10curricular materials suggested by education experts, child 11psychologists, or technology companies that work on child 12online safety issues. Materials may include without limitation 13safe online communications, privacy protection, 14cyber-bullying, viewing inappropriate material, file sharing, 15and the importance of open communication with responsible 16adults. The State Board of Education shall make these resource 17materials available on its Internet website.18(Source: P.A. 95-509, eff. 8-28-07; 95-869, eff. 1-1-09; 1996-734, eff. 8-25-09.)